District of Columbia statutes.
4-1407.01

Agency required to check enumerated registers for child abuse or neglect; effect of failure of agency to check or obtain information.

Prior to placement of a child in a family home, a child-placing agency licensed in the District of Columbia and the Department of Human Services shall:

(1)

Obtain written consent from applicants for release of information from:

(A)

The D.C. Child Protection Register established under subchapter I of Chapter 13 of this title;

(B)

Registers of child abuse and neglect located in all states, territories and possessions of the United States in which the applicant has resided within the previous 5 years; and

(C)

If applicable, from any registers maintained by any branch of the armed forces of the United States.

(2)

Check the proposed placement of a child in a family home with the Child Protection Register and, where applicable, with other registers pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1) of this section for the purpose of determining whether there has been a report of child abuse or neglect. Failure of an agency to make such check prior to placement may result in suspension, revocation, or refusal to renew that agency’s child placement license. Failure of any agency to obtain information from a register due to policies and procedures in those jurisdictions other than the District of Columbia or the various branches of the armed forces of the United States, prohibiting release of such information, shall not constitute a violation under this paragraph.

History

Apr. 22, 1944, 58 Stat. 193, § 7a
as added Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-141,§ 2(c), 29 DCR 2867

Cross References

Child abuse and neglect, access to register, restrictions on release of information, see § 4-1302.03.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-1302.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1008.1.